Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-504
Funds; separate accounts required; apportionment of income to each.

As soon as the apportionment of funds has been made, the department of accounts and finances shall open an account with each such fund authorized to be established by sections 14-501 and 14-502 and shall place a credit to each such fund of ninety percent of the tax levy apportioned to it. Thereafter the department shall credit such funds pro rata with money coming to the city from taxation and other sources which are applicable to current expense purposes until all such credits shall equal one hundred percent of such apportionment. The foregoing pro rata credits in excess of ninety percent shall not apply to the miscellaneous expense fund, but the miscellaneous expense fund shall be credited with all money collected and applicable to current expense purposes after the other funds have received the full one hundred percent of their appropriation.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 4, p. 470;

C.S.1922, § 3627;

C.S.1929, § 14-504;

R.S.1943, § 14-504;

Laws 2000, LB 1116, § 13.

When city council has good reason to believe that funds apportioned to a department would be exhausted, it is within the right of the city to suspend an employee of the department, but city cannot, in addition to suspension, arbitrarily deduct additional sums from salary. Bishop v. City of Omaha, 130 Neb. 162, 264 N.W. 447 (1936).